Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0415.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 109t. Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section, the department shall provide coverage under the medical assistance program for group prenatal care services. As used in this section: (a) âGroup prenatal care servicesâ means not more than 12 prenatal care visits provided in a group setting that are based on an evidence-based model. (b) âGroup settingâ means a group of not less than 3 individuals. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Secretary of the Senate Clerk of the House of Representatives Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor